en: coconut blossom syrup
de: Kokosblütensirup
fr: sirop de sucre de fleur de coco
hr: sirup od kokosovog cvijeta
it: sciroppo di fiori di cocco

en: wheat syrup
bg: пшеничен сироп
ca: xarop de blat
da: hvedesirup
de: Weizensirup
es: Jarabe de trigo, sirope de trigo
fi: vehnäsiirappi
fr: sirop de blé
hr: pšenični sirup
it: Sciroppo di grano
nl: tarwestroop

en: cane sugar syrup, cane syrup
da: rørsukkersirup
de: rohrzuckersirup
es: Jarabe de azúcar de caña, sirope de azúcar de caña
fi: ruokosokerisiirappi
fr: sirop de sucre de canne
hr: sirup od šećerne trske
it: Sciroppo di canna da zucchero
pl: syrop z cukru trzcinowego

en: partially inverted sugar syrup
bg: частично инвертиран захарен сироп
de: teilweise invertierter Zuckersirup
es: jarabe de azucar parcialmente invertido, sirope de azucar parcialmente invertido
fi: osittain invertoitu sokerisiirappi
fr: sirop de sucre partiellement inverti
hr: djelomično invertirani šećerni sirup
it: sciroppo di zucchero parzialmente invertito
sv: delvis inverterad sockersirap

en: maltitol syrup
bg: малтитолов сироп
ca: xarop de maltitol
fi: maltitolisiirappi
fr: sirop de maltitol
hr: maltitol sirup
hu: maltit-szirup, maltitol szirup
it: sciroppo di maltitolo
nl: maltitolsiroop, maltitolstroop

fr: sorbitols et glycérol, glycérol et sorbitols
fi: sorbitolia ja glyserolia, glyserolia ja sorbitolia

bg: сорбитолов сироп
fr: sirop de sorbitol de blé

en: rice glucose syrup
bg: оризов глюкозен сироп
ca: xarop de glucosa d'arròs
de: Reisglukosesirup
es: sirope de glucosa de arroz, jarabe de glucosa de arroz
fr: Sirop de glucose de riz
hr: rižin glukozni sirup
it: sciroppo di glucosio di riso

en: rice syrup
bg: оризов сироп
ca: xarop d'arròs
cs: rýžový sirup
da: rissirup
de: Reissirup
es: Sirope de arroz, jarabe de arroz
fi: riisisiirappi
fr: sirop de riz
hr: rižin sirup
hu: rizsszirup
it: sciroppo di riso
nl: Rijststroop, rijstsiroop
pl: syrop ryżowy
sv: rissirap

en: brown rice syrup
bg: сироп от кафяв ориз
de: brauner Reissirup
es: Jarabe de arroz integral, sirope de arroz integral
fr: Sirop de riz brun
hr: sirup od smeđe riže
it: sciroppo di riso integrale
nl: bruin maisstroop

en: caramelised rice syrup
bg: карамелизиран оризов сироп
hr: sirup od karamelizirane riže
hu: karamellizált rizsszirup
it: sciroppo di riso caramellato
pt: xarome de arroz caramelizado

en: sugar beet syrup
de: zuckerrübensirup
es: jarabe de remolacha azucarera, sirope de remolacha azucarera
fi: sokerijuurikassiirappi
fr: sirop de betterave
hr: sirup od šećerne repe
it: sciroppo di barbabietola da zucchero
nl: suikerbietstroop, suikerbietsiroop
sv: sockerbetssirap

en: brown sugar syrup
bg: сироп от кафява захар, кафяв захарен сироп
de: brauner zuckersirup
fi: ruskea sokerisiirappi
fr: Sirop de sucre brun, sirop de sucre mélassé
hr: sirup od smeđeg šećera
it: sciroppo di zucchero di canna
nl: bruine suikerstroop, bruine suiker siroop

en: dextrose
bg: декстроза
bs: dekstroza
ca: Dextrosa
cs: dextróza
da: dextrose
de: Dextrose
el: δεξτροζη
es: dextrosa
et: dekstroos
fi: dekstroosi, dekstroosia
fr: dextrose
he: דקסטרוז
hr: dekstroza
hu: dextróz
is: dextrósi
it: destrosio
ja: デキストロース
lt: dekstrozė
lv: dekstroze
nb: dekstrose
nl: dextrose
nn: dekstrose
no: dekstrose
pl: dekstroza
pt: dextrose
ro: dextroză, dextroza
ru: Декстроза
sk: dextróza
sl: dekstroza
sr: dekstroza
sv: dextros

en: organic dextrose
da: økologisk dextrose
de: Dextrose aus ökologischem Anbau
fi: luomudekstroosi, luomu dekstroosi
fr: dextrose biologique
hr: organska dekstroza
hu: bio dextróz
it: destrosio biologico
nl: biologische dextrose

en: corn dextrose, dextrose from corn
bg: царевична декстроза
bs: kukuruzna dekstroza
da: majsdextrose
de: Maisdextrose
es: dextrosa de maíz
et: maisidekstroos
fi: maissidekstroosi
fr: dextrose de maïs
hr: kukuruzna dekstroza
hu: dextróz kukoricából
it: destrosio di mais
lt: kukuruzu dekstrose
nl: maïsdextrose
nn: maisdekstrose
pl: dekstroza kukurydziana
pt: dextrose de milho
ro: dextroza din porumb
sl: dekstroza iz koruze
sv: majssocker, druvsocker från majs
tr: misir dekstrozu

en: wheat dextrose, dextrose from wheat
bg: пшенична декстроза
da: hvededextrose
de: Weizendextrose
es: Dextrosa de trigo
fi: vehnädekstroosi
fr: dextrose de blé
hr: pšenična dekstroza
hu: dextróz búzából
it: destrosio di frumento
nl: tarwedextrose
pl: dekstroza pszenna
pt: dextrose de trigo
sv: vetedextros

en: wheat or corn dextrose, corn or wheat dextrose
da: hvede- eller majsdextrose, majs- eller hvededextrose
de: Weizen- oder Maisdextrose, Mais- oder Weizendextrose
fi: vehnä- tai maissidekstroosi, maissi- tai vehnädekstroosi
fr: dextrose de blé ou de maïs, dextrose de maïs ou de blé
hr: pšenična ili kukuruzna dekstroza
hu: dextróz kukoricából vagy búzából
it: destrosio di grano o mais
nl: dextrose van tarwe of maïs

en: dextrose monohydrate
bg: декстроза монохидрат
de: Dextrosemonohydrat, Dextrose-Monohydrat
es: dextrosa monohidrato, dextrosa monohidratada
fr: dextrose monohydraté
hr: dekstroza monohidrat
it: destrosio monoidrato
nl: dextrose monohydraat
pt: dextrose monohidratada

en: polydextrose, E1200
bg: полидекстроза
da: polydextrose, polydekstrose
de: Polydextrose
es: Polidextrosa
fi: Polydekstroosi
fr: polydextrose
gl: Polidextrosa
hr: polidekstroza
hu: polidextróz
it: polidestrosio
ja: ポリデキストロース
nl: Polydextrose
pt: Polidextrose